Washington statutes.
RCW 43.72.915

Effective dates—1993 c 492.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993, except for:

(1) Sections 234 through 243, 245 through 254, and 257 of this act, which shall take effect January 1, 1996, or January 1, 1998, if funding is not provided as set forth in section 17(4) of this act; and

(2) Sections 301 through 303 of this act, which shall take effect January 1, 1994.

[ 1995 c 43 s 15; 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 603; 1993 c 492 s 495.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Contingent effective dates—1995 c 43: See note following RCW 70.05.030.

Severability—1995 c 43: See note following RCW 43.70.570.

Severability—Effective dates—Part headings, captions not law—1993 sp.s. c 25: See notes following RCW 82.04.230.